Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Article 1. Rights and Duties.

Sec. 12.61.010.
Rights of crime victims.

Victims of crimes have the following rights:

the right to be present during any proceeding in

the prosecution and sentencing of a defendant if the defendant has the right to be present, including being present during testimony even if the victim is likely to be called as a witness;

the adjudication of a minor as provided under AS

47.12.110

;

the right to be notified by the appropriate law enforcement agency or the prosecuting attorney of any request for a continuance that may substantially delay the prosecution and of the date of trial, sentencing, including a proceeding before a three-judge panel under AS

12.55.175

, an appeal, and any hearing in which the defendant’s release from custody is considered;

the right to be notified that a sentencing hearing or a court proceeding to which the victim has been subpoenaed will not occur as scheduled;

the right to receive protection from harm and threats of harm arising out of cooperation with law enforcement and prosecution efforts and to be provided with information as to the protection available;

the right to be notified of the procedure to be followed to apply for and receive any compensation under AS 18.67;

at the request of the prosecution or a law enforcement agency, the right to cooperate with the criminal justice process without loss of pay and other employee benefits except as authorized by AS

12.61.017

and without interference in any form by the employer of the victim of crime;

the right to obtain access to immediate medical assistance and not to be detained for an unreasonable length of time by a law enforcement agency before having medical assistance administered; however, an employee of the law enforcement agency may, if necessary, accompany the person to a medical facility to question the person about the criminal incident if the questioning does not hinder the administration of medical assistance;

the right to make a written or oral statement for use in preparation of the presentence report of a felony defendant;

the right to appear personally at the defendant’s sentencing hearing to present a written statement and to give sworn testimony or an unsworn oral presentation;

the right to be informed by the prosecuting attorney, at any time after the defendant’s conviction, about the complete record of the defendant’s convictions;

the right to notice under AS

12.47.095

concerning the status of the defendant found not guilty by reason of insanity;

the right to notice under AS

33.16.087

of a hearing concerning special medical parole of the defendant;

the right to notice under AS

33.16.120

of a hearing to consider or review discretionary parole of the defendant;

the right to notice under AS

33.30.013

of the release or escape of the defendant; and

the right to be notified orally and in writing of and receive information about the office of victims’ rights from the law enforcement officer initially investigating the crime and from the prosecuting attorney assigned to the offense; at a minimum, the information provided must include the address, telephone number, and Internet address of the office of victims’ rights; this paragraph

applies only to victims of felonies and to victims of class A misdemeanors if the class A misdemeanor is a crime involving domestic violence or a crime against a person under AS 11.41; if the victim is an unemancipated minor, the law enforcement officer and the prosecuting attorney shall also provide the notice required by this paragraph to the parent or guardian of the minor;

is satisfied if, at the time of initial contact with the crime victim, the investigating officer and prosecuting attorney each give each crime victim a brochure or other written material prepared by the office of victims’ rights and provided to law enforcement agencies for that purpose.

Law enforcement agencies, prosecutors, corrections agencies, social services agencies, and the courts shall make every reasonable effort to ensure that victims of crimes have the rights set out in (a) of this section. However, a failure to ensure these rights does not give rise to a separate cause of action against law enforcement agencies, other agencies of the state, or a political subdivision of the state.

History.

(§ 4 ch 154 SLA 1984; am § 8 ch 59 SLA 1989; am § 10 ch 57 SLA 1991; am § 17 ch 63 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 15 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

Definitions of “victim,” “domestic violence assault” — AS

12.61.900

Designation of Representative — AS

12.61.030

Interference by Victim’s Employer — AS

12.61.017

Participation by Victim in Sentencing — AS

12.55.023

Right to Comment on Motions to Modify or Reduce Sentence — AS

12.55.088

Right to Comment on Parole of Prisoner — AS

33.16.120

Right to Comment on Application for Executive Clemency — AS
33.2

Right to Comment of Furlough of Prisoner — AS

33.30.111

Cross references. —

For right of victims to comment on parole of prisoner, see AS

33.16.120

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective July 20, 2004, added paragraph (a)(15) and made related changes.

The 2012 amendment, effective September 17, 2012, in (a)(2), inserted “any request for a continuance that may substantially delay the prosecution and of” following “prosecuting attorney of.”

Sec. 12.61.015.
Duties of prosecuting attorney.

If a victim of a felony, a sex offense as defined in AS

12.63.100

, or a crime involving domestic violence requests, the prosecuting attorney shall make a reasonable effort to

confer with the person against whom the offense has been perpetrated about that person’s testimony before the defendant’s trial;

in a manner reasonably calculated to give prompt actual notice, notify the victim

of the defendant’s conviction and the crimes of which the defendant was convicted;

of the victim’s right in a case that is a felony to make a written or oral statement for use in preparation of the defendant’s presentence report, and of the victim’s right to appear personally at the defendant’s sentencing hearing to present a written statement and to give sworn testimony or an unsworn oral presentation;

of the address and telephone number of the office that will prepare the presentence report; and

of the time and place of the sentencing proceeding;

notify the victim in writing of the final disposition of the case within 30 days after final disposition of the case;

confer with the victim or the victim’s legal guardian concerning a proposed plea agreement before entering into the plea agreement to ask the victim or the victim’s legal guardian whether the victim is in agreement with the proposed plea agreement; the prosecuting attorney shall record whether the victim or the victim’s legal guardian is in agreement with the proposed plea agreement;

inform the victim of a pending motion that may substantially delay the prosecution and inform the court of the victim’s position on the motion; in this paragraph, a “substantial delay” is

for a misdemeanor, a delay of one month or longer;

for a felony, a delay of two months or longer; and

for an appeal, a delay of six months or longer.

The notice given under (a)(2) of this section must inform the victim that the statement, sworn testimony, or unsworn oral presentation of the victim may contain any relevant information including

an explanation of the nature and extent of physical, psychological, or emotional harm or trauma suffered by the victim;

an explanation of the extent of economic loss or property damage suffered by the victim;

an opinion of the need for and extent of restitution and whether the victim has applied for or received compensation for loss or damage; and

the recommendation of the victim for an appropriate sentence.

The state and the prosecuting attorney may not be held liable in damages for any failure to comply with the requirements of this section.

The court may reschedule a hearing to consider a plea agreement as needed to allow additional time to comply with the victim notification requirements under (a)(2) and (4) of this section.

Nothing in this section requires a victim or a victim’s legal guardian to provide a response to a prosecuting attorney regarding a plea agreement or requires the prosecuting attorney to be bound by the victim’s or legal guardian’s response regarding the plea agreement.

The prosecuting attorney shall notify a victim of a sex offense as defined in AS

12.63.100

or crime involving domestic violence as defined in AS

18.66.990

if, before trial, the offender of the victim is discharged from a treatment program for noncompliance.

History.

(§ 9 ch 59 SLA 1989; am §§ 11, 12 ch 57 SLA 1991; am § 16 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 72 SLA 2012; am § 94 ch 36 SLA 2016; am §§
9, 10 ch 11 SLA 2019; am § 80 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (f) was enacted as (d).
Relettered in 2019.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective September 17, 2012 added (a)(5).

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (a)(4), deleted “of a crime involving domestic violence”.

The first 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (a), in the introductory language, inserted “, a sex offense as defined in AS

12.63.100

,” following “If a victim of a felony”, rewrote (a)(4), which read, “confer with the victim concerning a proposed plea agreement before entering into an agreement”; added (d) and (e).

The second 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, added (d) [now (f)].

Sec. 12.61.016.
Duties of agency investigating a sexual offense.

A law enforcement agency investigating an offense under AS

11.41.410

-

11.41.470

may not disclose information related to the investigation to an employer of the victim unless

the victim expressly permits the disclosure; or

the agency determines the disclosure is necessary to investigate or prevent a crime.

History.

(§ 95 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 95, ch. 36, SLA 2016 makes this section effective October 9, 2016.

Sec. 12.61.017.
Interference by victim’s employer.

An employer may not penalize or threaten to penalize a victim of an offense because the victim

is subpoenaed or requested by the prosecuting attorney to attend a court proceeding for the purpose of giving testimony; or

reports the offense to a law enforcement agency or participates in the investigation of the offense by a law enforcement agency.

A person who violates (a) of this section is guilty of a violation.

A victim who suffers a pecuniary loss as a result of an employer’s act prohibited by this section may bring a civil action to recover actual damages and punitive damages of three times the actual damages sustained.

In this section, “penalize” means to take action affecting the employment status, wages, and benefits payable to the victim, including

demotion or suspension;

dismissal from employment; and

loss of pay or benefits, except pay and benefits that are directly attributable to the victim’s absence from employment to

attend the court proceeding;

report the offense to a law enforcement agency;

participate in a law enforcement agency investigation of the offense.

History.

(§ 9 ch 59 SLA 1989; am §§
96, 97 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

Definition of “victim” — AS

12.61.900

Fine Authorized for Violation — AS

12.55.035(b)(5)

Sentences for Violations — AS

12.55.140

Original Code Provision — None.

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1995, in subsection (a), “subsection” was substituted for “section” to correct a manifest error in ch. 59, SLA 1989.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 9, 2016, in the introductory language of (a), deleted “of an offense” following “penalize a victim”; designated portions of (a) as (a)(1) and (a)(2), in (a)(2), substituted “reports the offense to a law enforcement agency or participates in the investigation of the offense by a law enforcement agency” for “. In this subsection, “penalize” means to take action affecting the employment status, wages, and benefits payable to the victim, including (1) demotion or suspension; (2) dismissal from employment; and (3) loss of pay or benefits, except pay and benefits that are directly attributable to the victim’s absence from employment to attend the court proceeding”; added (d).

Sec. 12.61.020.
Money received as the result of the commission of a crime.

Every person contracting with an offender with respect to the reenactment of the offender’s crime by way of a movie, book, magazine article, radio or television presentation, or live entertainment of any kind, or to the expression of the offender’s thoughts, feelings, opinions, or emotions regarding the crime, shall pay to the state any money that would otherwise be owing to the offender.

A claim by a victim arising out of an order of restitution under AS

12.55.045

, or a judgment in a civil action against an offender for damages resulting from a crime is a superior claim for money that would otherwise be paid to the state under (a) of this section.

Notwithstanding other statutory limitations, a civil action by a victim against an offender for damages resulting from the commission of the crime must be commenced within 10 years of the date of the crime or the date of the discovery of the perpetrator of the crime if the perpetrator is unknown on the date of the commission of the crime.

For the purposes of this section, if the offender has not been convicted, proof of the commission of a crime must be established by a preponderance of the evidence.

In this section

“offender” means a person who has committed a crime in this state, whether or not the person has been convicted of the crime, or that person’s representative or assignee.

[Repealed, § 25 ch 59 SLA 1989.]

History.

(§ 4 ch 154 SLA 1984; am § 25 ch 59 SLA 1989; am §§ 10, 11 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

Definition of “victim” — AS

12.61.900

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 11, ch. 154, SLA 1984 provides that if this section is held invalid by a final decision of an appellate court, AS

18.67.165

, repealed by § 11, ch. 154, SLA 1984, is revived.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, made stylistic changes in (a) and (c).

Collateral references. —

Validity, construction, and application of “Son of Sam” laws regulating or prohibiting distribution of crime-related book, film, or comparable revenues to criminals. 60 ALR4th 1210.

Sec. 12.61.030.
Designation of representative.

If more than one person who qualifies as a victim under AS

12.55.185

makes a request under AS

12.61.010

—

12.61.030

, the prosecuting attorney shall designate one person for purposes of receiving the notice required and exercising the rights granted under AS

12.61.010

—

12.61.030

.

History.

(§ 10 ch 59 SLA 1989)

Cross references. —

Definition of “victim” — AS

12.61.900

Original Code Provision — None.

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1995, “AS

12.61.010

—

12.61.030

” was substituted for “this chapter” in both places, to reflect the 1991 enactment of AS

12.61.100

—

12.61.150

.

Sec. 12.61.050.
Automated victim notification system.

The Department of Corrections shall establish an automated victim notification system that automatically provides crime victims with notice by telephone when there is a change in the status of their offender. The system must also allow crime victims to initiate telephone calls to the system to receive the latest status report for their offender. An automated victim notification system established under this section satisfies the duty of a state agency to notify a crime victim of the change in status of an offender. The failure of a system to provide notice to a crime victim does not give rise to a separate cause of action by the crime victim against the state, an agency of the state, or a municipality, or the officers, employees, or contractors of the state, agency of the state, or municipality.

Each department and each municipality shall cooperate with the Department of Corrections in establishing and maintaining an automated victim notification system required under this section.

Through the automated victim notification system established in (a) of this section, the Department of Corrections shall notify a victim of a sex offense as defined in AS

12.63.100

or a crime involving domestic violence as defined in AS

18.66.990

of the option to request a protective order under AS

18.65.850

or AS

18.66.100

and provide contact information for state victim resources, including the Council on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault, the Alaska Network on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault, the office of victims’ rights, and the Violent Crimes Compensation Board. This notification must occur when the offender of the victim is released from incarceration or when the order under AS

12.55.015(l)

expires, whichever is later.

History.

(§ 1 ch 73 SLA 1997; am § 81 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, added (c).